Utah statutes.
58-46a-503.   Testing period for hearing aids.

(1)  Any person licensed under this chapter who sells a hearing aid to a consumer shall provide a written receipt or written contract to the consumer.  The written receipt or contract shall provide the consumer with a 30-day right to cancel the purchase if the consumer finds that the hearing aid does not function adequately for the consumer and to obtain a refund if the consumer returns the hearing aid to the seller in the same condition, ordinary wear and tear excluded, as when purchased.  The written receipt or contract shall notify the consumer of the 30-day right to cancel in at least 10 point type.  The 30-day right to cancel shall commence from either the date the hearing aid is originally delivered to the consumer or the date the written receipt or contract is delivered to the consumer, whichever is later.  The 30-day period shall be tolled for any period during which the hearing aid seller, dealer, or fitter has possession or control of the hearing aid after its original delivery.

(2)  Upon exercise of the right to cancel a hearing aid purchase, the seller of the hearing aid is entitled to a cancellation fee not to exceed 15% of all fees charged to the consumer, including testing, fitting, counseling, and the purchase price of the hearing aid.  The exact amount of the cancellation fee shall be stated in the written receipt or contract provided to the consumer.



Enacted by Chapter 249, 1998 General Session

